apertium-lvs.lvs.dix
    <pardef n="t/ikt__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ikšu</l><r>ikt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iksim</l><r>ikt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iksi</l><r>ikt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iksiet</l><r>ikt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iksit</l><r>ikt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iks</l><r>ikt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ikt</l><r>ikt<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iku</l><r>ikt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ikām</l><r>ikt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ikt</l><r>ikt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ikāt</l><r>ikt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ika</l><r>ikt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>īku</l><r>ikt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ieku</l><r>ikt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>īkam</l><r>ikt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iekam</l><r>ikt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iec</l><r>ikt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>īc</l><r>ikt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>īkat</l><r>ikt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iekat</l><r>ikt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>īk</l><r>ikt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iek</l><r>ikt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="tikt"><par n="ne"/><i>t</i><par n="t/ikt__vblex"/></e>
